ro-RO: Conținutul setului de panouri de sfert: Doar partea stângă; Pereche (stânga + dreapta); Doar partea dreaptă; Panou simplu cu secțiunile de reparație aferente; Altele
zh-TW: 後側圍板套組內容: 僅左側; 一對 (左側加右側); 僅右側; 單板含相關修復板; 其他
fr: Contenu de l’ensemble de panneaux de custode: Côté gauche uniquement; Paire (gauche et droite); Côté droit uniquement; Panneau unique avec sections de réparation associées; Autre
da: Kvartpanelsæts indhold: Kun venstre side; Par (venstre + højre); Kun højre side; Enkelt panel med relaterede reparationssektioner; Andet
vi: Nội dung bộ tấm ốp hông: Chỉ bên trái; Cặp (trái + phải); Chỉ bên phải; Tấm đơn với các phần sửa chữa liên quan; Khác
sl-SI: Vsebina kompleta bočne stene/blatnika: Samo leva stran; Par (levo + desno); Samo desna stran; Enojna plošča s pripadajočimi deli za popravilo; Drugo
pl: Zawartość zestawu ćwiartki nadwozia: Tylko lewa strona; Para (lewa + prawa strona); Tylko prawa strona; Pojedynczy panel z powiązanymi reperaturkami; Inne
hu: Oldalfalkészlet tartalma: Csak bal oldal; Pár (bal + jobb); Csak jobb oldal; Egyetlen panel a kapcsolódó javítórészekkel; Egyéb
ko: 분기 패널 세트 구성: 왼쪽 전용; 쌍(왼쪽 + 오른쪽); 오른쪽 전용; 관련 수리 부위가 있는 단일 패널; 기타
ru: Состав комплекта четверти кузова: Только левая сторона; Пара (левая + правая); Только правая сторона; Одна панель с соответствующими ремонтными деталями; Другое
fi: Takalokasuojasetin sisältö: Vain vasen puoli; Pari (vasen + oikea); Vain oikea puoli; Yksittäinen paneeli ja siihen liittyvät korjausosat; Muu
sv: Innehåll i kvartspanelsset: Endast vänster sida; Par (vänster + höger); Endast höger sida; Enkel panel med tillhörande reparationsdelar; Övrigt
lt-LT: Galinio sparno rinkinio turinys: Tik kairė pusė; Pora (kairė ir dešinė); Tik dešinė pusė; Viena plokštė su susijusiomis remonto sekcijomis; Kita
ja: クォーターパネルセット内容: 左側のみ; ペア (左+右); 右側のみ; 関連修理セクション付きシングルパネル; その他
el: Περιεχόμενα σετ πίσω πλαϊνού φτερού: Μόνο αριστερή πλευρά; Ζεύγος (αριστερά + δεξιά); Μόνο δεξιά πλευρά; Μονό πάνελ με σχετικά τμήματα επισκευής; Άλλο
th: ไตรมาสแผงชุดเนื้อหา: ฝั่งซ้ายเท่านั้น; เป็นคู่ (ซ้าย + ขวา); ฝั่งขวาเท่านั้น; แผงเดี่ยวพร้อมชิ้นส่วนซ่อมที่เกี่ยวข้อง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Painel lateral traseiro conteúdo do conjunto: Apenas lado esquerdo; Par (esquerdo + direito); Apenas lado direito; Painel único com seções de reparo relacionadas; Outro
es: Contenido del conjunto de paneles de cuarto: Solo lado izquierdo; Par (izquierdo y derecho); Solo lado derecho; Un solo panel con secciones de reparación relacionadas; Otro
pt-PT: Conteúdo do conjunto do painel lateral: Apenas lado esquerdo; Par (esquerdo e direito); Apenas lado direito; Painel único com secções de reparação relacionadas; Outro
zh-CN: 后侧围板套装内容: 仅左侧; 一对（左+右）; 仅右侧; 单个侧板及其相关维修部分; 其他
nl: Kwartpaneel set inhoud: Alleen linkerkant; Paar (links + rechts); Alleen rechterkant; Enkel paneel met bijbehorende reparatiedelen; Overig
hr-HR: Sadržaj kompleta zadnjeg blatobrana: Samo lijeva strana; Par (lijevo + desno); Samo desna strana; Pojedinačna stranica s pripadajućim dijelovima za popravak; Ostalo
nb: Innhold i kvartpanelsett: Kun venstre side; Par (venstre + høyre); Kun høyre side; Enkeltpanel med tilhørende reparasjonsseksjoner; Annet
cs: Obsah sady čtvrtpanelu: Pouze levá strana; Pár (levý + pravý); Pouze pravá strana; Jeden panel se souvisejícími opravnými díly; Jiné
bg-BG: Съдържание на комплекта за заден калник: Само лява страна; Двойка (лява и дясна); Само дясна страна; Единичен панел със свързани ремонтни секции; Друго
de: Inhalt des Seitenwandbereich-Sets: Nur linke Seite; Paar (links + rechts); Nur rechte Seite; Einziges Blech mit zugehörigen Reparaturabschnitten; Sonstige
it: Contenuti del set del pannello laterale: Solo lato sinistro; Coppia (sinistro + destro); Solo lato destro; Pannello singolo con relative sezioni di riparazione; Altro
tr: Çeyrek panel set içeriği: Sadece sol taraf; Çift (sol + sağ); Sadece sağ taraf; İlgili onarım parçalarıyla birlikte tek panel; Diğer
en: Quarter panel set contents: Left side only; Pair (left + right); Right side only; Single panel with related repair sections; Other
sk-SK: Obsah súpravy štvrťového panela: Len ľavá strana; Pár (ľavá a pravá); Len pravá strana; Jeden panel s príslušnými časťami na opravu; Iné